Illinois, session 104th, HB5164.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act is 5amended by adding Section 74 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 9/74 new)7    Sec. 74. Certified nursing assistant training.8    (a) The Department shall allow assisted living 9establishments licensed under the Assisted Living and Shared 10Housing Act and supportive living establishments operating 11under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 146 to provide an approved course of 12training for certified nursing assistants at the 13establishment, so long as the training meets the requirements 14of Section 3-206 of the Nursing Home Care Act and rules adopted 15by the Department, including the requirements of 77 Ill. Adm. 16Code 395 and 77 Ill. Adm. Code 955.17    (b) The Department shall allow the supervised clinical 18portion of an approved certified nursing assistant training 19program conducted under this Section to be completed either:20        (1) on site at an assisted living establishment or 21    supportive living establishment that demonstrates the 22    ability to meet Department clinical training and resident 23    acuity requirements; or  HB5164- 2 -LRB104 18641 BAB 32084 b1        (2) at a licensed skilled nursing or intermediate care 2    facility through an affiliation agreement approved by the 3    Department.4    (c) The Department shall allow an individual to satisfy 5the supervised clinical experience requirement for placement 6on the Health Care Worker Registry under 77 Ill. Adm. Code 7300.663 through supervised clinical training completed at an 8assisted living establishment or supportive living 9establishment licensed or approved under this Section, or at 10an affiliated site approved by the Department.11    (d) The Department shall adopt rules requiring that the 12Health Care Worker Registry include information identifying 13where an individual received clinical training and may amend 1477 Ill. Adm. Code 300, 395, and 955 as necessary to implement 15this Section.